District of Columbia statutes.
38-305

Teachers College tuition.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as preventing the Board of Education from requiring students of the District of Columbia Teachers College to pay tuition, and the said Board is authorized, in its discretion, to require the payment of tuition by the students of such college, whether or not resident in the District of Columbia, with the exception of those students who are authorized to be excused from the payment of tuition by an act other than this chapter.

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 86-725, § 7
Uniform per student funding formula, applicability to nonresident students, see § 38-2902.
2001 Ed., § 38-306.
1981 Ed., § 31-606.
1973 Ed., § 31-311.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4012(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
Former § 38-305 has been recodified as § 38-304.